Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $375,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Clemency Review Commission to increase the commission's capacity to process clemency petitions. new text end